Illinois, session 104th, SB1058.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Southern Illinois Economic Development 5Authority Act is amended by changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 519/5-5)7    Sec. 5-5. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Southern Illinois Economic Development Authority Act, and 9references in this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 94-1021, eff. 7-12-06.)